Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.113

Taxation of gambling activities—Disbursement.

Any county, city or town which collects a tax on gambling activities authorized pursuant to RCW 9.46.110 must use the revenue from such tax primarily for the purpose of public safety.

[ 2010 c 127 s 6; 1975 1st ex.s. c 166 s 11.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 166: See note following RCW 9.46.090.